Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.407

Abandoned or derelict vessels.

Any city or town has the authority, subject to the processes and limitation outlined in chapter 79.100 RCW, to store, strip, use, auction, sell, salvage, scrap, or dispose of an abandoned or derelict vessel found on or above publicly or privately owned aquatic lands within the jurisdiction of the city or town.

[ 2002 c 286 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 286: See RCW 79.100.901.